Oklahoma, session 2026, SB144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 569 of Title 57, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Department of Corrections shall establish a five-year


pilot program subject to the availability of funds called the


“Reentry and Housing Pilot Program”. The purpose of the pilot


program is to provide housing access to reduce the high rate of


homelessness and housing instability among inmates upon release and

Req. No. 1146 Page 1


to provide reentry and treatment services for such inmates through


the utilization of evidence-based practices.


B. The Reentry and Housing Pilot Program shall address, but not


be limited to, the following:


1. Creation of both rural and urban affordable housing


developments throughout this state;


2. Identification of the population of inmates that are at a


high risk for homelessness and housing instability upon release;


3. Development of a community-based housing access program that


provides comprehensive and specific services to former inmates who


are in need of stable housing;


4. A comprehensive reentry plan focused on parenting, life, and


employment skills for inmates upon release from custody, including a


modification of existing reentry programs and services;


5. Modification of existing substance abuse treatments and


rehabilitation programs offered to inmates upon release; and


6. Development of partnerships within local communities to


assist in the provision of support services and employment


opportunities to inmates upon release.


C. The Reentry and Housing Pilot Program shall be administered


by the Department of Corrections. The Department shall be


authorized to enter into public-private partnerships to assist with


housing stability and reentry and treatment services for former


inmates.

Req. No. 1146 Page 2


D. 1. The Department shall contract with a third-party entity


for an evaluation of the pilot program that will assess its


effectiveness in reducing recidivism among inmates transitioning


from prison into the community.


2. The Department shall electronically submit a report of the


findings from its evaluation of the pilot program to the Legislature


and the Governor annually for as long as the program is funded.


E. The Department shall promulgate rules to administer the


provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 569.A of Title 57, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the Department of Corrections to be designated the “Reentry and


Housing Pilot Program Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a


continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall


consist of all monies received by the Department of Corrections from


appropriations, donations, grants, or other sources of funding


provided for the purpose of administering the Reentry and Housing


Pilot Program. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are


hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the


Department of Corrections for the purpose provided for Section 1 of


this act. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants


issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by

Req. No. 1146 Page 3


law with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services for approval and payment. Of the available funds, the


Department may use up to five percent (5%) to cover administrative


costs.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1146 CN 12/30/2024 10:21:45 AM



































Req. No. 1146 Page 4